District of Columbia statutes.
25-701

Board-approved manager required.

(a)

A person designated to manage an establishment shall possess a manager’s license.

(b)

A licensee shall notify the Board within 7 calendar days of a manager’s conviction for other than a minor traffic violation.

(c)

This section shall not apply to the holder of a wholesaler’s license that is not open to the public or to licensees who personally superintend the establishment during licensed hours of sale.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-201, § 5(b), 55 DCR 6289
D.C. Law 17-201, in subsec. (c), substituted “the holder of a wholesaler’s license that is not open to the public or to licensees” for “licensees”.